Utah statutes.
41-1a-1304.   Operating motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer in excess of registered gross laden weight -- Class C misdemeanor.

It is a class C misdemeanor for a person to operate, or cause to be operated, a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, or combination of them the gross laden weight of which is in excess of the gross laden weight for which the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, or combination of vehicles is registered.

